Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2698.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Study committee on rental assistance; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The study committee on rental assistance is established consisting of the following members: 1. One member of the public who is a renter in this state and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 2. One member who is a rental housing developer in this state and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 3. One member of the public who is a licensed real estate broker and member of a statewide real estate organization and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 4. Two members who represent statewide tenant advocacy or housing organizations and who are appointed by the governor. 5. Two members who represent rental property owners and managers and who are appointed by the president of the senate. One member must represent multifamily properties and one member must represent mobile home parks. 6. The director of the department of economic security or the director's designee. 7. The director of the Arizona department of housing or the director's designee. 8. One republican member who is appointed by the majority leader of the house of representatives. 9. One democratic member who is appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. 10. Two members who represent local governments in this state and who are appointed on the recommendation of the executive director of a statewide organization that represents cities and towns in this state, one representing urban areas in this state, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one representing rural areas in this state, appointed by the president of the senate. B. The study committee shall: 1. Meet quarterly or more frequently as the study committee deems necessary. 2. Identify existing rental assistance programs operating in this state, including programs funded by federal, state and local sources. 3. Review eligibility criteria, administrative structures and reporting practices of rental assistance programs in this state. 4. Examine coordination among state agencies, political subdivisions and nonprofit organizations administering rental assistance. 5. Solicit input and testimony from stakeholders regarding rental assistance programs in this state. 6. Develop findings and recommendations regarding the effectiveness of rental assistance programs in this state. 7. On or before December 31, 2027, submit a report of the committee's findings and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of the state. C. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2028.